Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3254.06
Improvement project; special assessments; lien; delinquency; foreclosure; sale final; when.

(1) The natural resources district shall have a lien upon the real estate within its boundaries for all special assessments for improvement project areas which are due. Such lien shall be inferior only to general taxes levied by political subdivisions of the state. When such special assessments have become delinquent and the real property against which they are assessed has not been offered at any tax sale, the district may proceed in the district court in the county in which the real estate is situated to foreclose in its own name upon the lien in the same manner and with like effect as a foreclosure of a real estate mortgage, except that sections 77-1903 to 77-1917, shall govern in every case when applicable.

(2) Final confirmation of sale in such foreclosure proceedings and the issuance of a deed of sale to the district, or its assignee, cannot be had until two years have expired from the date of the sale held by the sheriff and until personal notice has been served on the occupants of the real property after such two-year period. The remedy granted in this section to a natural resources district for the collection of delinquent special assessments shall be cumulative and in addition to other existing methods.

Laws 1981, LB 388, § 7.